California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) When a county child welfare services agency is providing one parent with reunification services and the other parent is serving a prison term for the conviction of child abuse, pursuant to Section 273a, 273ab, or 273d of the Penal Code, any sex offense specified as being perpetrated against a minor, or an act of domestic violence, the county child welfare services agency may request that the Board of Prison Terms, with respect to inmates sentenced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 of the Penal Code, or the Department of Corrections, with respect to inmates sentenced pursuant to Section 1170 of the Penal Code, provide the agency, during the time in which reunification services are being provided, with notification that the person is scheduled to be released on parole, or rereleased following a period of confinement pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 56.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.2.

Prior to entering into a voluntary placement agreement with a parent or guardian, the social worker shall make every attempt to keep the family together by offering appropriate child welfare services except in the case of a voluntary placement pending relinquishment as provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 16507.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 53.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.3.

(a) Beginning on October 1, 1982, child welfare services for children placed voluntarily after January 1, 1982, shall be limited to a period not to exceed 180 days. Subject to the availability of federal funding, voluntary placement services for federally eligible children may be extended for an additional six months, for a total period not to exceed 12 months for either of the following:

(1) Families who have a custodial parent or guardian in residential substance abuse treatment who is demonstrating progress that indicates the problems warranting the initial placement are likely to be resolved within the extended time period.

(2) Families whose minor child is seriously emotionally disturbed, who requires placement in a residential treatment facility, who otherwise would be likely to be found to fit the description in subdivision (c) of Section 300, and who reasonably may be expected to be returned home within the extended time period.

(b) Whenever a seriously emotionally disturbed child as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is initially voluntarily placed, the initial placement shall be made pursuant to the approval of an interagency administrative review board as described in paragraph (4)
 of subdivision (a) of Section 16507.6.

(c) The extension of voluntary placement services for an additional six months shall be subject to the approval of an administrative review board pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 16507.6. The extension of voluntary placement services is contingent upon the receipt of federal funding. Any administrative and foster care costs that exceed the amount of federal reimbursement shall be paid solely with county funds.

(d) An otherwise eligible child placed voluntarily prior to January 1, 1982, may remain eligible for child welfare services without regard to the length of time in placement until April 1, 1984. Beginning on October 1, 1982, such a child shall receive administrative review pursuant to the requirements of Section 16503.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 65.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, voluntary family reunification services shall be provided without fee to families who qualify, or would qualify if application had been made therefor, as recipients of public assistance under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program as described in the State Plan in effect on July 1, 1996. If the family is not qualified for aid, voluntary family reunification services may be utilized, provided that the county seeks reimbursement from the parent or guardian on a statewide sliding scale according to income as determined by the State Department of Social Services and approved by the Department of Finance. The fee may be waived if the social worker determines that the payment of the fee may be a barrier to reunification. Section 17552 of the Family Code shall also
 apply.

(b) An out-of-home placement of a minor without adjudication by the juvenile court may occur only when all of the following conditions exist:

(1) There is a mutual decision between the child’s parent, Indian custodian, or guardian and the county welfare department in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Department of Social Services.

(2) There is a written agreement between the county welfare department and the parent or guardian specifying the terms of the voluntary placement. The State Department of Social Services shall develop a form for voluntary placement agreements that shall be used by all counties. The form shall indicate that foster care under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program is available to those children.

(3) In the case of an Indian child, in accordance with Section 1913 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), the following criteria are met:

(A) The parent or Indian custodian’s consent to the voluntary out-of-home placement is executed in writing at least 10 days after the child’s birth and recorded before a judge.

(B) The judge certifies that the terms and consequences of the consent were fully explained in detail in English and were fully understood by the parent or that they were interpreted into a language that the parent understood.

(C) A parent of an Indian child may withdraw his or her consent to a voluntary foster care placement or voluntary termination of parental rights or relinquishment for any reason at any time and the child shall be returned to the
 parent.

(D) The placement complies with preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(c) In the case of a voluntary placement pending relinquishment, a county welfare department shall have the option of delegating to a licensed private adoption agency the responsibility for placement by the county welfare department. If a delegation occurs, the voluntary placement agreement shall be signed by the county welfare department, the child’s parent or guardian, and the licensed private adoption agency.

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall amend its plan pursuant to Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code in order to conform to mandates of Public Law 96-272 and Public Law 110-351 for federal financial participation in voluntary
 placements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 34.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.5.

(a) (1) When a minor is separated, or is in the process of being separated, from the minor’s family under the provisions of a voluntary placement agreement, the county welfare department or a licensed private or public adoption agency social worker shall make any and all reasonable and necessary provisions for the care, supervision, custody, conduct, maintenance, and support of the minor, including medical treatment.

(2) Responsibility for placement and care of the minor shall be with the social worker who may place the minor in any of the following:

(A) The home of a relative or the home of a
 nonrelative extended family member, as described in Section 362.7, that has been
 assessed pursuant to Section 361.4 or, in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member as described by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1.

(B) The home of a resource family, as defined in Section 16519.5.

(C) A suitable licensed community care facility.

(D) With a foster family agency to be placed in a suitable licensed home or other family home which has been certified by the agency as meeting licensing standards.

(E) In the case of an Indian child, a tribally approved home as described by subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 and Section 10553.12 or a home or facility in accordance with the placement preferences described
 in Section 361.31.

(b) The granting of a community care license or approval status does not entitle the caregiver to the placement of a specific child or children. Placement is based on the child’s needs and best interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 34.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.6.

If a minor has been voluntarily placed with the county welfare department subsequent to January 1, 1982, for out-of-home placement by his or her parents or guardians pursuant to this chapter and the minor has remained out of their physical custody for a consecutive period not to exceed 180 days or at least 90 days before the minor attains 18 years of age, the department shall do one of the following:

(a) Return the minor to the physical custody of his or her parents or guardians.

(b) Refer the minor to a licensed adoption agency for consideration of adoptive planning and receipt of a permanent relinquishment of care and custody rights from the parents pursuant to Section 8700 of the Family Code.

(c) Apply for a petition pursuant to Section 332 and file the petition with the juvenile court to have the minor declared a dependent child of the court under Section 300, in that return to the parental home would be contrary to the best interests of the child. The petition shall be filed, and the juvenile court shall issue a dispositional order in the case, if appropriate, prior to the minor attaining 18 years of age.

(d) Refer the minor placed pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16507.3 to an interagency administrative review board as may be required in federal regulations. One member of the board shall be a licensed mental health practitioner. The review board shall review the appropriateness and continued necessity of six additional months of voluntary placement, the extent of the compliance with the voluntary placement plan, and the adequacy of services to the family and child. If the minor cannot be returned home by the 12th month of voluntary placement services, the department shall proceed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c).

(e) Refer the minor placed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16507.3 to an administrative review board as may be required in federal regulations and as described in subdivision (b) of Section 16503. If the minor cannot be returned home by the 12th month of voluntary placement services, the department shall proceed as described
 in subdivision (b), (c), or (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 487, Sec. 10.   (AB 787)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.7.

Each agency or entity, except for a community college, which offers a parenting course as part of a family maintenance or family reunification effort for a parent or parents of a child who has been adjudicated or is in the process of being adjudicated a dependent child of the court under Section 300, or whose family is participating in a voluntary family maintenance program, shall meet all of the requirements specified in this section. Effective July 1, 1992, organizations which receive state funding for the purpose of providing parenting courses shall meet those requirements as a condition of receiving state funding. The requirements are as follows:

(a) Each parenting course shall be no more than six months in duration, and shall meet for a specified number of hours determined by each program as sufficient for the program to meet all of the requirements listed in subdivision (b). 

(b) The curriculum shall include all of the following components: 

(1) Building self-esteem, including, but not limited to, parents’ building a positive parental identity and building the self-esteem of their children. 

(2) Handling stress and anger. 

(3) The growth and development of children, including, but not limited to, safety, nutrition, and health. 

(4) Developing and increasing
 communication skills in order that a parent may learn to listen to and speak with his or her child or children. 

(5) Learning to use positive disciplinary mechanisms as alternatives to the physical punishment of a child, including, but not limited to, learning what constitutes abuse and neglect. 

(6) Learning the boundaries of permissible sexual conduct by adults with regard to children. 

(7) Respect for, and sensitivity to, cultural differences in child rearing practices in addressing all of the topics listed in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive. 

(c) Each parenting course is encouraged to have a maximum parent to teacher ratio of 15 parents for each teacher. 

(d) Each parenting course is
 encouraged to conduct an initial assessment and interview of each parent enrolled in the course. 

(e) Each parenting course shall give a preliminary examination prior to the start of the parenting course and an examination at the conclusion of the parenting course to measure changes in parental attitudes. 

(f) Each parenting course shall enter into a written agreement with each parent with respect to the responsibilities a parent must satisfy in order to pass the course. 

(g) The staff of each parenting course shall have training in the following areas: 

(1) The prevention of child abuse and neglect. 

(2) Parenting techniques. 

(h) Each parenting course shall provide all of the following information to the county welfare department of the county in which the course is taught, for clients referred through child welfare services programs: 

(1) Level of participation by parents. 

(2) Number of course hours completed. 

(3) Topics covered during attendance in class by a parent and topics covered during a parent’s absence from class.

(4) Assessment of a parent’s gain in his or her knowledge about parenting as demonstrated by tests prior to and after the parenting course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1112, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16508.

Permanent placement services shall be provided or arranged for by county welfare department staff for children who cannot safely live with their parents and are not likely to return to their own homes, and to nonminor dependents in planned permanent living arrangements. Permanent placement services, including supportive transition services, shall be available without regard to income to the following children:

(a) Children judged dependent under Section 300 where a review has determined that reunification, adoption, tribal customary adoption, or guardianship is inappropriate.

(b) Recipients of public assistance under the nonfederally funded Aid to Families with Dependent Children Foster Care program who are wards of a legal guardian pursuant to Section 11405, where a review has determined that reunification or adoption is inappropriate.

(c) On and after January 1, 2012, nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who are receiving AFDC-FC pursuant to Section 11403.

(d) For purposes of this section, “supportive transition services” means permanent placement services provided to nonminor dependents as described in subdivision (v) of
 Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 57.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16508.1.

(a) For every child who is in foster care, or who enters foster care, on or after January 1, 1999, and has been in foster care for 15 of the most recent 22 months, the social worker shall submit to the court a recommendation that the court set a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 for the purpose of terminating parental rights. The social worker shall concurrently initiate and describe a plan to identify,
 recruit, process and approve a qualified family for adoption of the child.

(b) The social worker is not required to submit the recommendation as described in subdivision (a) if any of the following applies:

(1) The case plan for the child has documented a compelling reason or reasons why it is unlikely that the child will be adopted, as determined by the department when it is acting as an adoption agency or by the licensed adoption agency, and therefore termination of parental rights would not be in the best interest of the child or that one of the conditions set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 366.26 applies.

(2) A hearing under Section 366.26 is already set.

(3) The court has found at the previous hearing under Section 366.21 that
 there is a substantial probability that the child will be returned to the child’s home within the extended period of time permitted.

(4) The court has found at the previous hearing under Section 366.21 that reasonable reunification services have not been offered or provided.

(5) The court has found at each and every hearing at which the court was required to consider reasonable efforts or services that reasonable efforts were not made or that reasonable services were not offered or provided.

(6) The incarceration or institutionalization of the parent or parents, or the court-ordered participation of the parent or parents in a residential substance abuse treatment program, constitutes a significant factor in the child’s placement in foster care for a period of 15 of the most recent 22 months, and termination of
 parental rights is not in the child’s best interests, considering factors such as the age of the child, the degree of parent and child bonding, the length of the sentence, and the nature of the treatment and the nature of the crime or illness.

(7) Tribal customary adoption is recommended.

(c) A recommendation to the court pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made if the social worker documents in the case record a compelling reason why a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 is not in the best interest of the child, or that reasonable efforts to safely return the child home are continuing consistent with the time period provided for in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 366.21.

(d) Beginning January 1, 1999, the county welfare department shall implement a procedure for reviewing the application of this
 section to the case plans of all children who have been in foster care for 15 out of the most recent 22 months. The review shall proceed within the following timeframes:

(1) By July 1, 1999, one-third of the children shall have been reviewed, giving priority to children who have been in foster care the greatest length of time.

(2) By January 1, 2000, at least two-thirds of the children shall have been reviewed.

(3) By July 1, 2000, all children shall have been reviewed.

(e) For purposes of this section, a child shall be considered to have entered foster care on the earlier of the date of the jurisdictional hearing held pursuant to Section 356 or the date that is 60 days after the date on which the child was initially removed from the home of his or her
 parent or guardian.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 287, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 132.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16508.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish additional alternatives to foster care placements. Therapeutic day services is an alternative which has been shown in other states to be effective in reunifying families, and in avoiding or shortening the time the children must stay in foster care, and in reunifying placed children with their families. It has also been found to be significantly less expensive than foster care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1139, Sec. 4.   Effective September 21, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16509.

Cultural and religious child-rearing practices and beliefs which differ from general community standards shall not in themselves create a need for child welfare services unless the practices present a specific danger to the physical or emotional safety of the child.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16508 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 58.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16509.1.

No child who in good faith is under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof shall, for that reason alone, be considered to have been neglected within the purview of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 62.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16509.2.

The physical or mental incapacity, or both, in itself, of a parent or a child, shall not result in a presumption of need for child welfare services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 63.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16511.

This chapter shall not be construed to give the department or county welfare departments any law enforcement powers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in such a manner as to give the department any law enforcement powers, nor to change or interfere with the responsibility of law enforcement, probation officers and departments to take direct action on behalf of children as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 625) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 and Article 7 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2. Nor shall this part in any way relieve persons
 administering and working in child welfare services programs from the obligation resting on all citizens to report crimes to duly authorized law enforcement agencies. Nothing herein shall be construed as changing in any way the responsibility of probation officers and departments for initiating juvenile court proceedings as set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2, nor other duties and responsibilities assigned to them by law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16506 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 45.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16512.

(a) The department shall report every third year, commencing in 1989, to the Legislature on the operation and progress of the child welfare services program.

(b) The report shall include both of the following:

(1) The number of reported child abuse cases, on an aggregate basis and on a county-by-county basis, and by types of abuse.

(2) The disposition of cases reported, on an aggregate basis and on a county-by-county basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 722, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16513.

Anyone participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this chapter shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from the report.

(History: Amended (as renumbered by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 842, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16513.2.

Funding of this chapter is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16513 (as added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 630.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16513.5.

Any party to a dependency proceeding may bring a motion before the juvenile court to have a social worker removed from the case. The juvenile court judge in the dependency proceeding shall grant the motion if a preponderance of evidence shows that a conflict of interest has occurred that would interfere with the social worker’s ability to objectively carry out his or her duties, which may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(a) The social worker has had sexual contact, as defined in
 Section 43.93 of the Civil Code, with any party to the dependency proceedings.

(b) The social worker has a relationship with an individual who is adopting or attempting to adopt a child who is the subject of the pending dependency proceeding, and the relationship is of such a nature that a conflict of interest or bias may exist on the part of the social worker which may compromise his or her objectivity.

(c) The social worker has been convicted of perjury with regard to the dependency proceeding before the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16514.

(a) A child or nonminor who has been voluntarily placed, adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or as to whom a petition has been filed under Section 325, may be housed in an emergency shelter or, pursuant to the procedures for placement set forth in this code, placed in a foster family home, a resource family home, or with a foster family agency for subsequent placement in a certified family home or with a resource family, with minors adjudged wards of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601.

(b) A child who has been voluntarily placed, adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or adjudged a ward of the juvenile
 court pursuant to Section 601, shall not be housed in an emergency shelter with any minor adjudged a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602.

(c) (1) A child or nonminor who has been voluntarily placed, adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or as to whom a petition has been filed under Section 325, or a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, shall not be placed or detained in a short-term residential therapeutic program, group home, licensed foster family home, resource family, or certified family home or resource family of a foster family agency, with any minor adjudged a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602, unless the social worker or probation officer with placement authority has determined that both of the following
 are true:

(A) The placement setting has a program that meets the specific needs of the child or nonminor dependent being placed or detained, or, in the case of placement when no program is required by law, the home meets the specific needs of the child or nonminor.

(B) There is a commonality of needs with the other children and nonminor dependents in the placement setting.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 206, a child who has been voluntarily placed, adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or as to whom a petition has been filed under Section 325, or a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, may be placed with a child or nonminor who is a current dependent of the
 juvenile court and for whom a petition has been subsequently filed alleging he or she is a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602. That placement may be made only when the social worker or probation officer with placement authority has determined that both of the
 following are true:

(A) The placement setting meets the specific needs of the child or nonminor dependent being placed or detained.

(B) There is a commonality of needs with the other children and nonminor dependents in the placement setting.

(d) Nothing in this section shall transfer or eliminate the responsibility of the placing agency for the care, custody, or control of the child. Nothing in this section shall relieve a foster family agency of its responsibilities for or on behalf of a child placed with it.

(e) For purposes of this section, the placing of children or nonminor dependents by foster family agencies shall be referred to as
 “subsequent placement” to distinguish the activity from the placing by public agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 102.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16515.

(a) A county child welfare agency may establish a three-year pilot program in which the county partners with a domestic violence consultant from a domestic violence victim service organization, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, to offer support and guidance to county social workers in addressing the complex dynamics of families who are potentially experiencing both domestic violence and child maltreatment in order to enhance the social worker’s knowledge of domestic violence and their ability to apply that knowledge to their work with
 parent survivors and their children through tailored engagement and intervention strategies. The consultant shall be a qualified domestic violence counselor, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(b) Under the pilot program, the domestic violence consultant shall assist county social workers by doing, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Provide education on domestic violence-related dynamics and services.

(2) Discuss complicating factors, including, but not limited to, children witnessing or experiencing violence during domestic violence incidents, homelessness, and substance and alcohol use.

(3) Discuss protective measures, including, but
 not limited to, implementing safety plans or restraining orders to protect parent survivors and their children, and child removal from homes affected by domestic violence.

(4) Offer recommendations for accessing resources for families.

(5) Navigate law enforcement responses to reports of domestic violence.

(c) The domestic violence consultant may also provide direct support to parent survivors by facilitating shelter access, referring their children to therapy, and providing information on other resources.

(d) (1) If a county implements the pilot program pursuant to this section, the county shall conduct a comprehensive evaluation of
 the pilot program and report its findings to the Legislature on or before October 31, 2031. A participating county shall seek the input of the State Department of Social Services and stakeholders, including people with lived experience with domestic violence and child welfare, in the design and implementation of the evaluation. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Data on each instance when safety plans or restraining orders were implemented in homes affected by domestic violence and the outcomes for each family utilizing protective measures.

(B) Data on the recommendations provided to families who were identified as needing to access resources and the outcomes of their use.

(C) Data on law enforcement responses to each report of domestic violence.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   (AB 779)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions)
-------------------------------------------

16516.

(a) No social worker or probation officer acting as an officer of the court for purposes of this chapter shall, directly or indirectly, lobby for, act as a consultant to, enter into a business transaction with, acquire ownership of, or obtain a pecuniary interest in, any business, whether organized for profit or as a nonprofit entity, which has received any funds or income from court-ordered child welfare services.

(b) (1) Any public law enforcement agency
 or any private entity shall have standing to bring an action seeking a civil remedy pursuant to this section in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to any or all of the following remedies, as ordered by the court, in its discretion:

(A) Restitution of funds received in violation of this section.

(B) Statutory damages of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed treble the amount of the funds received in violation of this section.

(C) Actual damages resulting from a violation of this section.

(D) Termination of the grant or contract.

(E) Reasonable
 attorney’s fees.

(F) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(c) For purposes of this section, “court-ordered child welfare services” include those services ordered by the court pursuant to Sections 11450 and 16501 for a dependent or ward of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 231.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16516.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, all foster children who are placed in group homes by county welfare departments or county probation departments shall be visited at least monthly by a county social worker or probation officer. Each monthly visit shall include a private discussion between the foster child and the county social worker or probation officer. The private discussion shall not be
 held in the presence or immediate vicinity of the group home staff. The social worker or probation officer shall advise the foster child that he or she has the right to request that the private discussion occur outside the group home. If a foster child requests to have the private discussion outside the group home, that private discussion shall not replace the visit in the group home. However, the social worker or probation officer shall not be required to schedule an additional visit to accommodate the request. The contents of the private discussion shall not be disclosed to the group home staff, except that the social worker or probation officer may disclose information under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The social worker or probation officer believes that the foster child may be in danger of harming himself or herself, or others.

(2) The social worker or probation
 officer believes that disclosure is necessary to meet the needs of the child.

(3) The child consents to disclosure of the information.

(b) The location of monthly visits for each foster child who is placed in a group home by a county welfare department or a county probation department shall comply with federal requirements as described in Section 624(f)(2)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. No more than two consecutive monthly visits may be held outside the residence of the foster child.

(c) If the visit does not occur in the place of residence, the social worker or probation officer shall document in the case file and in the court report the location of the visit and the reason for the visit occurring outside the place of residence.

(d) (1) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, notwithstanding Section 10101, the state shall pay 100 percent of the nonfederal costs associated with the monthly visitation requirement in subdivision (a) in excess of the minimum semiannual visits required under current regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (SB 342)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16516.6.

(a) When a county social worker or probation officer makes a regular visit with a child in any licensed, certified, or approved foster home, the regular visit shall include a private discussion between the foster child and the social worker or probation officer. The private discussion shall not be held in the presence or immediate vicinity of the foster parent or caregiver. The social worker or probation
 officer shall advise the foster child that he or she has the right to request that the private discussion occur outside the foster home. If a foster child requests to have the private discussion outside the foster home, that private discussion shall not replace the visit in the foster home. However, the social worker or probation officer shall not be required to schedule an additional visit to accommodate the request. The contents of the private discussion shall not be disclosed to the foster parent or caregiver, except that the social worker or probation officer may disclose information under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The social worker or probation officer believes that the foster child may be in danger of harming himself or herself, or others.

(2) The social worker or probation officer believes that disclosure is necessary to meet the needs of the child.

(3) The child consents to disclosure of the information. 

(b) The location of monthly visits for each foster child who is placed in a licensed, certified, or approved foster home by a county welfare department or a county probation department shall comply with federal requirements as described in Section 624(f)(2)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. No more than two consecutive monthly visits may be held outside the residence of the foster child.

(c) If the visit does not occur in the place of residence, the social worker or probation officer shall document in the case file and in the court report the location of the visit and the reason for the visit occurring outside the place of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   (SB 342)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16517.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to accomplish both of the following:

(A) To prevent the unnecessary separation of children from their families because of homelessness or the lack of shelter.

(B) To assist in the reunification of foster children and their families when housing
 remains a problem.

(2) Through the Section 8 housing certificate program created by Section 553 of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act (P.L. 101-625), housing assistance may be made available to families eligible for assistance under this program.

(b) (1) For the purposes of the Section 8 housing certificate program created by Section 553 of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act (P.L. 101-625), the county department of social services is designated “the public child welfare agency.”

(2) If a county chooses to participate in the Section 8 housing certificate program, all of the following shall occur:

(A) The county department of social services shall make the determination, pursuant to Section 553
 of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act (P.L. 101-625), that an eligible child is at imminent risk of placement in out-of-home care or that an eligible child in out-of-home care under its supervision may be returned to his or her family.

(B) The county department of social services shall certify an eligible family as one for which the lack of adequate housing is a primary factor in the imminent placement of the family’s child or children in out-of-home care or in the delayed discharge of a child or children to the family from out-of-home care.

(C) The county department of social services shall transmit, in writing, its certification pursuant to subparagraph (B) to the local public housing agency responsible, pursuant to Section 34327.3 of the Health and Safety Code, for administering assistance under the Section 8 housing certificate program.
